Massachusetts, session 194th, H4198.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 6 of Chapter 70 of the General laws, no
regional vocational school district shall receive an annual contribution from a member
municipality greater than the percentage increase appropriated for the member’s traditional
public school district’s annual budget percentage increase.
of 1